Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2632
Grant; match required; procedure.

(1) Each grant recipient under the Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Grant Program shall provide the one-to-one match prior to receiving any disbursement of grant proceeds under the program.

(2) The department shall specify how a grant recipient may provide proof of a one-to-one match for a grant.

(3) The department shall disburse the grant proceeds to any grant recipient that provides satisfactory proof of a one-to-one match. The grant may be disbursed in increments as determined by the department.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 36.